Maryland, session 2025, HB1519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 485 of the Acts of 2009
– 5 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(B) [East Baltimore Biotechnology Park] JUG HANDLE
CONNECTOR. Provide a grant to the [Mayor and City Council
of the City of Baltimore for property] COUNTY EXECUTIVE
AND COUNTY COUNCIL OF HOWARD COUNTY FOR THE
acquisition, [demolition, and site improvements in the East
Baltimore Biotechnology Park area, subject to the requirement
that the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose] PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION,
REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, SITE
IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE JUG
HANDLE CONNECTOR. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2032 ([Baltimore City] HOWARD COUNTY) .............. [5,000,000]
1,000,000
(B–1) STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER.
PROVIDE A GRANT TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER,
INCLUDING A NEW ROOF. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ............... 211,693
Chapter 444 of the Acts of 2012
Section 1(3)
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK
(Prince George’s County)
(G) HEALTH AND HUMAN SCIENCES BUILDING. PROVIDE
FUNDS TO DESIGN, CONSTRUCT, AND EQUIP THE HEALTH
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
AND HUMAN SCIENCES FACILITY IN THE NEW COLE FIELD
HOUSE, PROVIDED THAT, NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 6
OF THIS ACT, WORK MAY COMMENCE ON THIS PROJECT
PRIOR TO THE APPROPRIATION OF ALL FUNDS NECESSARY
TO COMPLETE THIS PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY
NOT TERMINATE PRIOR TO JUNE 1, 2032 ............................. 250,000
Chapter 444 of the Acts of 2012, as amended by Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016,
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018, and Chapter 576 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(AS) Hamilton Street Parking. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of
(i) [$250,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of the Hyattsville
Community Development Corporation for the planning, design,
and reconstruction of the Hamilton Street Parking Garage,
located in Hyattsville. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of real property.
Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this grant may not
terminate before June 1, 2023 (Prince George’s County) .......... [250,000]
0
Chapter 424 of the Acts of 2013
Section 1(3)
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK
(Prince George’s County)
(G) HEALTH AND HUMAN SCIENCES BUILDING. PROVIDE
FUNDS TO DESIGN, CONSTRUCT, AND EQUIP THE HEALTH
AND HUMAN SCIENCES FACILITY IN THE NEW COLE FIELD
HOUSE, PROVIDED THAT, NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 6
OF THIS ACT, WORK MAY COMMENCE ON THIS PROJECT
PRIOR TO THE APPROPRIATION OF ALL FUNDS NECESSARY
TO COMPLETE THIS PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY
NOT TERMINATE PRIOR TO JUNE 1, 2032 ............................. 350,000
– 7 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(C) Maryland STEM Lab at Broad Creek Memorial Scout
Reservation. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$250,000]
$0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to the
Board of Directors of the Baltimore Area Council Boy Scouts of
America, Inc. for the construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, and capital equipping of the Maryland STEM
Lab. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching
fund may consist of real property or in kind contributions
(Statewide) .................................................................................... [250,000]
0
(AS) [Berwyn Heights Town Administration Building and Senior
Center Power Improvements] STRATHMORE HALL
PERFORMING ARTS CENTER. Provide a grant equal to the
lesser of (i) OF [$80,000] $25,005 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided, [to the Mayor and Town Council of the
Town of Berwyn Heights] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF
THE STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION, INC. for the
acquisition, PLANNING, design, construction, EXPANSION,
REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, SITE
IMPROVEMENT, AND capital equipping[, and installation of
emergency generators at the Berwyn Heights Town
Administration Building and Senior Center (Prince George’s
County)] OF THE STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS
CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW ROOF. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (MONTGOMERY
COUNTY) ................................................................................ [80,000]
25,005
(AY) Glassmanor Recreational Center Renovations. Provide a grant
equal to the lesser of (i) [$100,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided, to the Maryland–National Capital
Park and Planning Commission for the construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the
Glassmanor Recreational Center. Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of real property
(Prince George’s County) ............................................................. [100,000]
0
Chapter 424 of the Acts of 2013, as amended by Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
Section 1(3)
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(AK) [Maryland Youth Ballet Institutional Capacity Building]
ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL
CENTER. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of (i) $100,000 or
(ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to the Board of
Directors of Maryland Youth Ballet, Inc.] TO THE BOARD OF
DIRECTORS OF ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE, INC., D.B.A.
ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL
CENTER for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the [Maryland Youth Ballet Institutional Capacity
Building. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of real property, in kind
contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective date of
this Act and the grantee has until June 1, 2016, to present
evidence that a matching fund will be provided] ADVENTIST
HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL CENTER,
INCLUDING A NEW CARE TOWER. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (Montgomery County) .... 100,000
Chapter 463 of the Acts of 2014
Section 1(3)
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK
(Prince George’s County)
(F) HEALTH AND HUMAN SCIENCES BUILDING. PROVIDE
FUNDS TO DESIGN, CONSTRUCT, AND EQUIP THE HEALTH
AND HUMAN SCIENCES FACILITY IN THE NEW COLE FIELD
HOUSE, PROVIDED THAT, NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 6
OF THIS ACT, WORK MAY COMMENCE ON THIS PROJECT
PRIOR TO THE APPROPRIATION OF ALL FUNDS NECESSARY
TO COMPLETE THIS PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY
NOT TERMINATE PRIOR TO JUNE 1, 2032 ............................. 600,000
500,000
– 9 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(W) [Mount Auburn Cemetery] STRATHMORE HALL
PERFORMING ARTS CENTER. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of [the Mount Auburn Cemetery Company to plan
and design restorations and improvements to the Mount
Auburn Cemetery (Baltimore City)] THE STRATHMORE
HALL FOUNDATION, INC. FOR THE ACQUISITION,
PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR,
RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT,
AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE STRATHMORE HALL
PERFORMING ARTS CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW ROOF.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ........................................................ 100,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(AR) 15sq Arts Center. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
[$125,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,
to The Performing Arts Center Statutory Trust for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, and capital equipping of the 15sq Arts Center.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of real property or funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Frederick County) ................................ [125,000]
0
(BP) [Warner Manor] ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE
MEDICAL CENTER. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
OF [$100,000] $70,440 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, [to the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF
ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE, INC., D.B.A. ADVENTIST
HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL CENTER for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the
[Warner Manor] ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE
MEDICAL CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW CARE TOWER.
[Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of real property] NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (Montgomery County) .......................... [100,000]
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
70,440
(BR) Brentwood Town Center Project. Provide a grant equal to the
lesser of (i) [$100,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching
fund provided, to the Mayor and Town Council of the Town of
Brentwood for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the
Brentwood Town Center (Prince George’s County) .................... [100,000]
0
(BW) Experience Salubria Project. Provide a grant equal to the lesser
of (i) [$37,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of the African American
Heritage Preservation Group, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and
capital equipping of the Experience Salubria Project at the
Potomac River Heritage Visitors Center (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... [37,000]
0
(BZ) Laurel Armory–Anderson and Murphy Community Center.
Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$75,000] $0 or (ii) the
amount of the matching fund provided, to the Mayor and City
Council of the City of Laurel for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and
capital equipping of the Laurel Armory–Anderson and Murphy
Community Center (Prince George’s County) ............................ [75,000]
0
(CA) Laurel Park Path System Improvements. Provide a grant equal
to the lesser of (i) [$75,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided, to the Mayor and City Council of the
City of Laurel for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the Laurel Park Path System (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... [75,000]
0
(CE) Firemen’s Heritage Museum. Provide a grant equal to the
lesser of (i) [$105,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching
fund provided, to the Board of Directors of the Leonardtown
Volunteer Fire Department, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and
capital equipping of the Firemen’s Heritage Museum.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of real property or in kind contributions (St. Mary’s
– 11 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
County) ......................................................................................... [105,000]
0
(CJ) Willards Lions Club. Provide a grant of [$50,000] $0 to The
International Association of Lions Clubs and the Willards
Lions Club for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the
Willards Lions Club (Wicomico County) ..................................... [50,000]
0
(CL) STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER.
PROVIDE A GRANT TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER,
INCLUDING A NEW ROOF. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ................ 192,000
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Y) [Upton Planning Committee Project] BELL DENTAL CLINIC.
Provide a grant of $50,000 to the Board of Directors of the
[Upton Planning Committee, Inc. for the Upton Planning
Committee, subject to a requirement that the grantee provide
and expend a matching fund of $10,000. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of in kind
contributions] BELL DENTAL CLINIC, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE
BELL DENTAL CLINIC. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2032 (Baltimore City) .................................................... 50,000
(BC) Silver Spring Volunteer Fire Department Station #16. Provide
a grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$100,000] $0 or (ii) the amount
of the matching fund provided, to the Board of Trustees of the
Silver Spring Volunteer Fire Department, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, and capital equipping of the Silver Spring
Volunteer Fire Department Station #16. NOTWITHSTANDING
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT
MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027 (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... [100,000]
0
(BH) Brentwood Town Center Project. Provide a grant equal to the
lesser of (i) [$50,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Mayor and Town Council of the Town of
Brentwood for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the
Brentwood Town Center (Prince George’s County) .................... [50,000]
0
(BL) Experience Salubria Project. Provide a grant equal to the lesser
of (i) [$43,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of the African American
Heritage Preservation Group, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and
capital equipping of the Experience Salubria Project at the
Potomac River Heritage Visitors Center (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... [43,000]
0
(BM) Forest Heights Town Hall Renovation. Provide a grant equal to
the lesser of (i) [$50,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching
fund provided, to the Mayor and Town Council of the Town of
Forest Heights for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the Forest Heights Town Hall. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of real
property, in kind contributions, or funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Prince George’s County) ..................... [50,000]
0
(BN) Laurel Armory–Anderson & Murphy Community Center.
Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$75,000] $0 or (ii) the
amount of the matching fund provided, to the Mayor and City
Council of the City of Laurel for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and
capital equipping of the Laurel Armory–Anderson & Murphy
Community Center (Prince George’s County) ............................. [75,000]
0
(BW) STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER.
PROVIDE A GRANT TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION, INC. FOR THE
– 13 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER,
INCLUDING A NEW ROOF. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ................ 284,189
Chapter 463 of the Acts of 2014, as amended by Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016 and
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017
Section 1(3)
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Q) [East Baltimore Historical Library] ST. AGNES
HEALTHCARE. Provide a grant of $50,000 to the Board of
Directors of [the East Baltimore Historical Library, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
East Baltimore Historical Library (Baltimore City)] ST. AGNES
HEALTHCARE, INC. TO ASSIST IN THE DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING
OF THE FAMILY BIRTHING CENTER. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (BALTIMORE CITY) ...... 50,000
Chapter 463 of the Acts of 2014, as amended by Chapter 576 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(I) [MedStar Montgomery Medical Center] ADVENTIST
HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL CENTER. Provide a
grant to the [governing board of the MedStar Montgomery
Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the renovation of the
Emergency Department at the MedStar Montgomery Medical
Center, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may
consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act.]
BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE,
INC., D.B.A. ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
MEDICAL CENTER FOR THE ACQUISITION, PLANNING,
DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR,
RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, AND CAPITAL
EQUIPPING OF THE ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY
GROVE MEDICAL CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW CARE
TOWER. Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this grant
may not terminate before June 1, [2023] 2032 (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... [300,000]
9,076
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(C) [Camp Whippoorwill Restoration and Preservation Project]
STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER. Provide
a grant [equal to the lesser of (i) $125,000 or (ii) the amount of
the matching fund provided, to the Board of Directors of the
Girl Scouts of Central Maryland, Inc.] TO THE BOARD OF
DIRECTORS OF THE STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION,
INC. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the [Camp Whippoorwill Restoration and
Preservation Project, including the installation and
development of a living shoreline. Notwithstanding Section 1(5)
of this Act, the matching fund may consist of real property, in
kind contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective date
of this Act] STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING
ARTS CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW ROOF. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this grant may not terminate before
June 1, [2023 (Statewide)] 2032 (MONTGOMERY
COUNTY) ...................................................................................... [125,000]
48,616
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(C) Camp Whippoorwill Restoration and Preservation Project.
Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$125,000] $0 or (ii)
the amount of the matching fund provided, to the Board of
Directors of the Girl Scouts of Central Maryland, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, permitting and construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the
Camp Whippoorwill Restoration and Preservation Project,
including the installation of upland mitigation improvements,
bio–retention facilities, diversion berm and swale
improvements, living shoreline improvements, soil
stabilization, improvements to glens, yurts, boathouse, and
– 15 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
other preservation, protection, and restoration measures.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the grantee has until
June 1, 2023, to present evidence that a matching fund will be
provided and the matching fund may consist of real property,
in kind contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective
date of this Act. Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this
grant may not terminate before June 1, 2023 (Statewide) ......... [125,000]
0
(AF) Historic Tome School. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
[$100,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,
to the Board of Directors of the Bainbridge Development
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the
Historic Tome School. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the grantee has until June 1, 2023, to present evidence that a
matching fund will be provided and the matching fund may
consist of real property, in kind contributions, or funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act.
Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this grant may not
terminate before June 1, 2023 (Cecil County)............................. [100,000]
0
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015
Section 1(3)
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK
(Prince George’s County)
(F) HEALTH AND HUMAN SCIENCES BUILDING. PROVIDE
FUNDS TO DESIGN, CONSTRUCT, AND EQUIP THE HEALTH
AND HUMAN SCIENCES FACILITY IN THE NEW COLE FIELD
HOUSE, PROVIDED THAT, NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 6
OF THIS ACT, WORK MAY COMMENCE ON THIS PROJECT
PRIOR TO THE APPROPRIATION OF ALL FUNDS NECESSARY
TO COMPLETE THIS PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY
NOT TERMINATE PRIOR TO JUNE 1, 2032 ............................. 575,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
(C) [Clarence H. “Du” Burns Memorial Project] STRATHMORE
HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER. Provide a grant to the
[governing board of The Clarence H. “Du” Burns Memorial
Fund, Inc. and the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City to
assist in funding the design, construction, and equipping of a
memorial to honor the late former Baltimore City Mayor,
Clarence H. “Du” Burns, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose
(Baltimore City)] BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER,
INCLUDING A NEW ROOF. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ............... 200,000
(V) Camp Woodlands Restoration Project. Provide a grant equal to
the lesser of (i) [$250,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching
fund provided, to the Board of Directors of the Girl Scouts of
Central Maryland, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, restoration,
and capital equipping of buildings and facilities at Camp
Woodlands, including site improvements to the camp, located
in Anne Arundel County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this
Act, the matching fund may consist of real property, in kind
contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective date of
this Act (Anne Arundel County) .................................................. [250,000]
0
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(F) [Alpha Phi Alpha Corporate Headquarters] BETHEL
OUTREACH CENTER. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of (i)
$50,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to the
Board of Directors of the Alpha Phi Alpha Fraternity,
Incorporated] OF $43,000 TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF
THE BETHEL OUTREACH CENTER, INC. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, EXPANSION, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the [Alpha
Phi Alpha Corporate Headquarters, located in Baltimore City.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of real property, in kind contributions, or funds
– 17 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
expended prior to the effective date of this Act] BETHEL
OUTREACH CENTER. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2032 (Baltimore City) ...................................................
[50,000]
43,000
(AW) Park Berkshire Neighborhood Park. Provide a grant equal to
the lesser of (i) [$100,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching
fund provided, to the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of concession stands, storage facilities, and restroom
buildings at Park Berkshire Neighborhood Park, located in
Prince George’s County (Prince George’s County) ...................... [100,000]
0
ZA03 SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(L) [In For Of Building Renovation] STRATHMORE HALL
PERFORMING ARTS CENTER. Provide a grant [of $50,000] to
the Board of Directors of [In For Of, Inc.] THE STRATHMORE
HALL FOUNDATION, INC. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, and capital equipping of the [In For Of
Building, located in Baltimore City (Baltimore City)]
STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER,
INCLUDING A NEW ROOF. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ................ 50,000
(AV) [Four Corners Community Outreach Site] ADVENTIST
HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL CENTER.
Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i) OF [$100,000] $92,700
or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, [to the Board
of Trustees of the Silver Spring United Methodist
Church] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF ADVENTIST
HEALTHCARE, INC., D.B.A. ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE
SHADY GROVE MEDICAL CENTER for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, EXPANSION, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the [Four
Corners Community Outreach Site project, located in
Montgomery County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of in kind contributions]
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL
CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW CARE TOWER.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. [100,000]
92,700
(BE) Crossland High School. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
[$75,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,
to the Board of Education of Prince George’s County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, and capital equipping of the Crossland High
School, located in Prince George’s County. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of in
kind contributions or funds expended prior to the effective date
of this Act (Prince George’s County) ............................................ [150,000]
0
(BJ) Park Berkshire Neighborhood Park. Provide a grant equal to
the lesser of (i) [$150,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching
fund provided, to the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of concession stands, storage facilities, and restroom
buildings at Park Berkshire Neighborhood Park, located in
Prince George’s County (Prince George’s County) ...................... [150,000]
0
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015, as amended by Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017 and
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022
Section 1(3)
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(B) [Doctors Community Hospital] DISCOVERY POINT
REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of [Luminis Health Doctor’s Community Medical
Center, Inc. to assist with] THE COLLEGE PARK CITY –
UNIVERSITY PARTNERSHIP, INC. FOR THE acquisition,
PLANNING, design, construction, EXPANSION, REPAIR,
renovation, RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, and
CAPITAL equipping of [an ambulatory behavioral Health
Services Unit, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose, provided
– 19 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may commence
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project] THE DISCOVERY POINT
REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT. Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of
this Act, this authorization may not terminate prior to June 1,
[2024] 2032 (Prince George’s County) ......................................... 380,000
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015, as amended by Chapter 626 of the Acts of 2022
Section 1(3)
ZA03 SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(BI) [Landover Hills Town Hall] ST. AGNES HEALTHCARE.
Provide a grant of $50,000 to the [Mayor and Town Council of
the Town of Landover Hills for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and
capital equipping of the Landover Hills Town Hall, located in
Prince George’s County. Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this
Act, this grant may not terminate before June 1, 2025 (Prince
George’s County)] BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF ST. AGNES
HEALTHCARE, INC. TO ASSIST IN THE DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING
OF THE FAMILY BIRTHING CENTER. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (BALTIMORE CITY) ...... 50,000
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016
Section 1(3)
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK
(Prince George’s County)
(E) HEALTH AND HUMAN SCIENCES BUILDING. PROVIDE
FUNDS TO DESIGN, CONSTRUCT, AND EQUIP THE HEALTH
AND HUMAN SCIENCES FACILITY IN THE NEW COLE FIELD
HOUSE, PROVIDED THAT, NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 6
OF THIS ACT, WORK MAY COMMENCE ON THIS PROJECT
PRIOR TO THE APPROPRIATION OF ALL FUNDS NECESSARY
TO COMPLETE THIS PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY
NOT TERMINATE PRIOR TO JUNE 1, 2032 ............................. 3,100,000
350,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(Q) [Glen Burnie High School Field House and Concession Stand]
DISCOVERY POINT DEVELOPMENT PROJECT. Provide a
grant [equal to the lesser of (i) $1,000,000 or (ii) the amount of
the matching fund provided, to the Board of Education of Anne
Arundel County] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
COLLEGE PARK CITY – UNIVERSITY PARTNERSHIP, INC.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the [athletic field house and concession stand at
Glen Burnie High School, located in Anne Arundel County.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of real property, in kind contributions, or funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Anne Arundel
County)] DISCOVERY POINT REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY) .................................................. [1,000,000]
43,124
(Y) [Leadenhall Community Outreach Center] STRATHMORE
HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER. Provide a grant [equal
to the lesser of (i) $500,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching
fund provided, to the Board of Trustees of the Leadenhall
Baptist Church] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION, INC. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, EXPANSION, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of the
[Leadenhall Community Outreach Center, located in
Baltimore City. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of in kind contributions or funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore City)]
STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER,
INCLUDING A NEW ROOF. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
[500,000]
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ................
223,497
– 21 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(AI) Prince George’s County Public High School Athletic Facilities.
Provide a grant to the Prince George’s County Office of the
County Executive for the planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site work, and capital
equipping of athletic facilities at Prince George’s County public
high schools. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2032 (Prince George’s County) .................................................... [2,700,000]
0
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(C) [Doctors Community Hospital] HOWARD COUNTY – NEW
CULTURAL CENTER (APCE). Provide a grant to the [Board
of Directors of Doctors Hospital, Inc. to assist with renovations
to the Lowery Building to establish the Doctors Community
Healthcare Center, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project (Prince George’s County)]
COUNTY EXECUTIVE AND COUNTY COUNCIL OF HOWARD
COUNTY FOR THE ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION,
RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL
EQUIPPING OF A NEW CULTURAL CENTER.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(HOWARD COUNTY) .................................................................. 500,000
(G) ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE Shady Grove Medical Center.
Provide a grant to the Board of [Trustees] DIRECTORS of
Adventist Healthcare, Inc., d.b.a. ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE
Shady Grove Medical Center to assist with renovating space to
create a new outpatient pediatric rehabilitation area and
Neonatal Intensive Care Unit lounge, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may commence on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 279,000
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
(H) [University of Maryland Rehabilitation and Orthopedic
Institute] STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS
CENTER. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of [the
James Lawrence Kernan Hospital, d.b.a., University of
Maryland Rehabilitation and Orthopedic Institute, to renovate
and enlarge the patient waiting and registration areas, subject
to the requirement that the grantee provide an equal and
matching fund for this purpose, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project (Baltimore City)] THE STRATHMORE HALL
FOUNDATION, INC. FOR THE ACQUISITION, PLANNING,
DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR,
RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, AND CAPITAL
EQUIPPING OF THE STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING
ARTS CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW ROOF.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ......................................................... 150,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(CG) STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER.
PROVIDE A GRANT TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER,
INCLUDING A NEW ROOF. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ............... 125,000
(CH) RIVERDALE BAPTIST ATHLETIC COMPLEX. PROVIDE A
GRANT TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE RIVERDALE
BAPTIST SCHOOL, INC. FOR THE ACQUISITION, PLANNING,
DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR,
RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT,
AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE RIVERDALE BAPTIST
ATHLETIC COMPLEX. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2032 (PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY) ...................... 150,000
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
– 23 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) Friends Aware Facility. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of
(i) [$75,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of the Friends Aware,
Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the Friends Aware facility, located in Allegany
County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching
fund may consist of real property, in kind contributions, or
funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Allegany
County) ......................................................................................... [75,000]
0
(T) Scottish Rite Temple Preservation and Restoration. Provide a
grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$150,000] $0 or (ii) the amount
of the matching fund provided, to the Board of Directors of the
Maryland Scottish Rite Charitable Foundation, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, historic preservation, and capital equipping of
the Scottish Rite Temple, located in Baltimore City.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of real property, in kind contributions, or funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. [150,000]
0
(AY) [Jewish Community Center of Greater Washington Children’s
Playground] ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE
MEDICAL CENTER. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of (i)
$100,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Directors of the Jewish Community Center of
Greater Washington, Inc.] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS
OF ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE, INC., D.B.A. ADVENTIST
HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL CENTER for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of [a
children’s playground, including the installation of playground
equipment and site improvements to the park, located in
Montgomery County] THE ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE
SHADY GROVE MEDICAL CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW
CARE TOWER. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2032 (Montgomery County)......................................................... [100,000]
3,165
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
(BJ) [Fil–American Multicultural Center] ST. AGNES
HEALTHCARE. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of (i)
$100,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Directors of the National Philippine Cultural
Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the Fil–American Multicultural Center, located in
Prince George’s County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this
Act, the matching fund may consist of real property or in kind
contributions (Prince George’s County)] TO THE BOARD OF
DIRECTORS OF ST. AGNES HEALTHCARE, INC. TO ASSIST
IN THE DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION, AND
CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE FAMILY BIRTHING CENTER.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(BALTIMORE CITY) .................................................................... 100,000
(BK) Hillcrest Heights Community Center Pool. Provide a grant
equal to the lesser of (i) [$250,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided, to the Maryland–National Capital
Park and Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and
capital equipping of a pool for the Hillcrest Heights Community
Center, located in Prince George’s County. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of real
property (Prince George’s County) .............................................. [250,000]
0
(BN) Olde Mill Community and Teaching Center. Provide a grant
equal to the lesser of (i) [$75,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided, to the Board of Directors of the Olde
Mill Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the Olde Mill Community and Teaching Center,
located in Prince George’s County. Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of real property
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. [75,000]
0
(BS) Habitat for Humanity of Wicomico County. Provide a grant
equal to the lesser of (i) [$100,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided, to the Board of Directors of the
Habitat for Humanity of Wicomico County, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, and capital equipping of four Habitat for
– 25 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Humanity of Wicomico County properties, located in Wicomico [100,000]
County (Wicomico County) ........................................................... 0
(BV) STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER.
PROVIDE A GRANT TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER,
INCLUDING A NEW ROOF. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ............... 300,000
(BW) DISCOVERY POINT DEVELOPMENT PROJECT. PROVIDE A
GRANT TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE COLLEGE
PARK CITY – UNIVERSITY PARTNERSHIP, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE DISCOVERY POINT
REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY) ................................................................................... 185,000
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018
Section 1(3)
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(L) [Dr. Christina Phillips Community Center] STRATHMORE
HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER. Provide a grant [of
$150,000 to the Board of Directors of Community Initiatives,
Incorporated] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION, INC. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, EXPANSION, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of [Dr.
Christina Phillips Community Center, located in Baltimore
City (Baltimore City)] THE STRATHMORE HALL
PERFORMING ARTS CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW ROOF.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ......................................................... [150,000]
50,000
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter 737 of the Acts of 2019
Section 1(3)
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(K) Berean Child Care Center. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of
(i) [$100,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Trustees of the Berean Baptist Church
of Baltimore City, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, demolition, site
work, and capital equipping of the Berean Child Care Center,
located in Baltimore City. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this
Act, the grantee has until June 1, 2021, to present evidence that
a matching fund will be provided and the matching fund may
consist of real property or funds expended prior to the effective
date of this Act (Baltimore City) .................................................. [100,000]
0
(N) Get Involved Community Center. Provide a grant equal to the
lesser of (i) [$50,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Trustees of New Miracle Christian
Community Church, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the Get Involved Community Center, located in
Baltimore City. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
grantee has until June 1, 2021, to present evidence that a
matching fund will be provided and the matching fund may
consist of real property, in kind contributions, or funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... [50,000]
0
(AD) Sharp Road Community Park. Provide a grant of [$50,000] $0
to the Mayor and Town Council of the Town of Denton for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, and capital equipping of Sharp Road
Community Park, including landscaping and site
improvements to the park’s grounds and athletic fields, located
in Caroline County, subject to a requirement that the grantee
provide and expend a matching fund of $45,000.
Notwithstanding section 1(5) of this Act, the grantee has until
– 27 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
June 1, 2021, to present evidence that a matching fund will be
provided and the matching fund may consist of in kind
contributions or funds expended prior to the effective date of
this Act (Caroline County) ........................................................... [50,000]
0
(BR) Maryland Multicultural Youth Centers. Provide a grant equal
to the lesser of (i) [$75,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided, to the Board of Directors of the Latin
American Youth Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and
capital equipping of the Center for Educational Partnership of
the Maryland Multicultural Youth Centers, located in Prince
George’s County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
grantee has until June 1, 2021, to present evidence that a
matching fund will be provided and the matching fund may
consist of in kind contributions (Prince George’s County) .......... [75,000]
0
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(L) Berean Child Care Center. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of
(i) [$60,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Trustees of the Berean Baptist Church
of Baltimore City, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, demolition, site
work, and capital equipping of the Berean Child Care Center,
located in Baltimore City. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this
Act, the grantee has until June 1, 2021, to present evidence that
a matching fund will be provided and the matching fund may
consist of real property or funds expended prior to the effective
date of this Act (Baltimore City)................................................... [60,000]
0
(BM) Maryland Multicultural Youth Centers. Provide a grant equal
to the lesser of (i) [$125,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided, to the Board of Directors of the Latin
American Youth Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and
capital equipping of the Center for Educational Partnership of
the Maryland Multicultural Youth Centers, located in Prince
George’s County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
grantee has until June 1, 2021, to present evidence that a
matching fund will be provided and the matching fund may
consist of in kind contributions (Prince George’s County) ........... [125,000]
0
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018 and
Chapter 595 of the Acts of 2020
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AS) Damascus High School Athletic Facilities. Provide a grant
[equal to the lesser of (i) $75,000 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided,] to the Board of Directors of the
Damascus High School Athletic Booster Club Inc. and the
County Executive and County Council of Montgomery County
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of athletic
facilities for Damascus High School, including site
improvements, located in Montgomery County.
[Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the grantee has until
June 1, 2022, to present evidence that a matching fund will be
provided.] Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this grant
may not terminate before June 1, [2024] 2027 (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 75,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(P) [International Black Fire Fighters Museum] STRATHMORE
HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER. Provide a [$50,000
grant to the Board of Directors of the African American Fire
Fighters Historical Society, Inc. and the Mayor and City
Council of Baltimore City] GRANT TO THE BOARD OF
DIRECTORS OF THE STRATHMORE HALL FOUNDATION,
INC. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the [International Black Fire Fighters Museum,
located in Baltimore City (Baltimore City)] STRATHMORE
HALL PERFORMING ARTS CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW
ROOF. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT,
THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(MONTGOMERY COUNTY) ......................................................... [50,000]
40,000
(AY) Damascus High School Athletic Facilities. Provide a grant
[equal to the lesser of (i) $75,000 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided,] to the Board of Directors of the
– 29 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Damascus High School Athletic Booster Club Inc. and the
County Executive and County Council of Montgomery County
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of athletic
facilities for Damascus High School, including site
improvements, located in Montgomery County.
[Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the grantee has until
June 1, 2022, to present evidence that a matching fund will be
provided.] Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this grant
may not terminate before June 1, [2024] 2027 (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 75,000
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(AU) Damascus High School Athletic Facilities. Provide a grant
[equal to the lesser of (i) $50,000 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided,] to the Board of Directors of the
Damascus High School Athletic Booster Club Inc. and the
County Executive and County Council of Montgomery County
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, and capital equipping of athletic
facilities for Damascus High School, including site
improvements, located in Montgomery County.
[Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the grantee has until
June 1, 2022, to present evidence that a matching fund will be
provided.] Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this grant
may not terminate before June 1, [2024] 2027 (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 50,000
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter 737 of the Acts of 2019
and Chapter 576 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(BR) Robert W. Johnson Community Center. Provide a [$50,000] $0
grant to the Board of Directors of the Robert W. Johnson
Community Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, and capital
equipping of the Robert W. Johnson Community Center,
located in Washington County. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027 (Washington County) ..... [50,000]
0
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019,
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020, and Chapter 141 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(A) Adventist Healthcare Shady Grove Medical Center. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Adventist HealthCare, Inc.,
d.b.a., Adventist Healthcare Shady Grove Medical Center [to
assist with renovations to provide space for psychological and
physical health services, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project. Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the grantee has until June 1, 2030, to present
evidence that a matching fund will be provided.] FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE ADVENTIST
HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL CENTER,
INCLUDING A NEW CARE TOWER. Notwithstanding Section
1(7) of this Act, this grant may not terminate before June 1,
[2030] 2032 (Montgomery County) ............................................. 392,000
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017
Section 1(3)
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK
(Prince George’s County)
(E) HEALTH AND HUMAN SCIENCES BUILDING. PROVIDE
FUNDS TO DESIGN, CONSTRUCT, AND EQUIP THE HEALTH
AND HUMAN SCIENCES FACILITY IN THE NEW COLE FIELD
HOUSE, PROVIDED THAT, NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 6
OF THIS ACT, WORK MAY COMMENCE ON THIS PROJECT
PRIOR TO THE APPROPRIATION OF ALL FUNDS NECESSARY
TO COMPLETE THIS PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY
NOT TERMINATE PRIOR TO JUNE 1, 2032 ............................. 125,000
– 31 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
500,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(O) [Maryland Independent College and University Association –
McDaniel College] DISCOVERY POINT DEVELOPMENT
PROJECT. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of (i) $3,000,000
or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to the Board
of Trustees of McDaniel College for the design, construction, and
equipping of the Gill Physical Education Learning Center,
subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an equal and
matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of
this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior
to the effective date of this Act (Carroll County)] TO THE BOARD
OF DIRECTORS OF THE COLLEGE PARK CITY –
UNIVERSITY PARTNERSHIP, INC. FOR THE ACQUISITION,
PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR,
RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, AND CAPITAL
EQUIPPING OF THE DISCOVERY POINT REDEVELOPMENT
PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2032 (PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY) ........................................ [3,000,000]
22,246
(U) Sinai Hospital of Baltimore. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Sinai Hospital of Baltimore, Inc. for the planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, and capital equipping
of a community primary and specialty care complex AND
ADJACENT REQUIRED PARKING GARAGE, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2027 (Baltimore City) ................................................... 2,000,000
(BD) Arthur Perdue Stadium Improvements. Provide a grant to the
County Executive and County Council of Wicomico County for
the planning, design, construction, repairs, reconstruction,
renovation, site improvements, and capital equipping of various
infrastructure improvements to Arthur Perdue Stadium
(Wicomico County) ........................................................................ [500,000]
375,000
0
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
(F) Garrett County Memorial Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of [Garrett County Memorial Hospital]
GRMC, INC. to design, renovate, and equip operating rooms
and relocate the decontamination and central sterile areas,
subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an equal
and matching fund for this purpose. [Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act]
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027
(Garrett County) ........................................................................... 472,000
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(G) Darley Park Community Park. Provide a grant of [$50,000,] $0
to the Board of Directors of The Sixth Branch, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
neighborhood park in the Darley Park community, located in
Baltimore City, subject to a requirement that the grantee
provide and expend a matching fund of $29,000 (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... [50,000]
0
(G–1) [Downtown Cultural Arts Center] FRANKLIN
ENTREPRENEURIAL AND APPRENTICESHIP CENTER.
Provide a grant of $100,000 to the Board of Directors of the
[Downtown Cultural Arts Center and Banquet Hall, Inc.]
FRANKLIN ENTREPRENEURIAL AND APPRENTICESHIP
CENTER INC. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of [Downtown
Cultural Art Center, including improvements to the building’s
elevators, located in Baltimore City] THE FRANKLIN
ENTREPRENEURIAL AND APPRENTICESHIP CENTER.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 100,000
(J) [Most Worshipful Prince Hall Grand Lodge] BETHEL
OUTREACH CENTER. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of
(i)] OF $100,000 [or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Trustees of The Most Worshipful
Prince Hall Grand Lodge, Free and Accepted Masons of
– 33 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Maryland and Its Jurisdiction, Inc. for the Most Worshipful
Prince Hall Grand Lodge, located in Baltimore City.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of in kind contributions or funds expended prior to
the effective date of this Act] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS
OF THE BETHEL OUTREACH CENTER, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE
BETHEL OUTREACH CENTER. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (Baltimore City) .............. 100,000
(N) Double Rock Park. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
[$250,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,
to the County Executive and County Council of Baltimore
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Double Rock Park, located in Baltimore
County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching
fund may consist of real property, in kind contributions, or
funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore
County) .......................................................................................... [250,000]
0
(S) Ner Israel Rabbinical College. Provide a grant equal to the
lesser of (i) [$90,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of the Ner Israel Rabbinical
College, Inc. for the Ner Israel Rabbinical College facility,
located in Baltimore County (Baltimore County) ........................ [90,000]
0
(AD) [National Center for Manufacturing Sciences] KENNEDY
KRIEGER INSTITUTE – LEAP FACILITY RENOVATION AND
EXPANSION. Provide a grant of $100,000 to the [Board of
Directors of the National Center for Manufacturing Sciences for
the Agile Materials Manufacturing Processing Center, located
in Harford County (Harford County)] KENNEDY KRIEGER
INSTITUTE FOR THE ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION,
RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL
EQUIPPING OF FACILITIES FOR THE LIFESKILL AND
EDUCATION FOR STUDENTS WITH AUTISM AND OTHER
PERVASIVE BEHAVIORAL CHALLENGES (LEAP)
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
PROGRAM. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2032 (BALTIMORE CITY) ........................................................... 100,000
(AE) The Epicenter at Edgewood. Provide a grant of [$50,000] $0 to
the Board of Directors of The Epicenter at Edgewood for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of The
Epicenter at Edgewood, located in Harford County (Harford
County) .......................................................................................... [50,000]
0
(AM) [Consumer Product Safety Commission Site] GAITHERSBURG
MUNICIPAL COMPLEX. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of
(i) $100,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,]
to the Mayor and City Council of the City of Gaithersburg for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the [former Consumer Product Safety
Commission site, located in Montgomery County]
GAITHERSBURG MUNICIPAL COMPLEX.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 100,000
(AO) Interfaith Watershed Restoration and Outreach Project.
Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$15,000] $0 or (ii) the
amount of the matching fund provided, to the Board of
Directors of the Beth Sholom Congregation and Talmud Torah
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a watershed and conservation green space, located
in Montgomery County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this
Act, the matching fund may consist of in kind contributions
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. [15,000]
0
(AQ) Korean Community Service Center Branch Office. Provide a
grant of [$100,000] $0 to the Board of Directors of the Korean
Community Service Center of Greater Washington,
Incorporated for the Korean Community Service Center,
located in Montgomery County, subject to a requirement that
the grantee provide and expend a matching fund of $50,000
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. [100,000]
0
– 35 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(AR) Laytonsville Lions Club Medical Equipment Loan Building.
Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of (i) $5,000 or (ii) the
amount of the matching fund provided,] to the Board of
Trustees of the Laytonsville Lions Club Foundation, Inc. for the
PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR,
RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT,
AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE Laytonsville Lions Club,
located in Montgomery County. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY
OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE GRANTEE MAY BE
REIMBURSED FOR EXPENSES INCURRED ON OR AFTER
JUNE 1, 2013. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2032 (Montgomery County) ........................................................ 5,000
(BI) St. Ann’s Center for Children, Youth and Families. Provide a
grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$50,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of
the matching fund provided, to the Board of Directors of St.
Ann’s Center for Children, Youth and Families for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Hope House at St. Ann’s Center for Children, Youth and
Families, located in Prince George’s County (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... [50,000]
0
(BN) ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL
CENTER. PROVIDE A GRANT TO THE BOARD OF
DIRECTORS OF ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE, INC., D.B.A.
ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL
CENTER FOR THE ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION,
RECONSTRUCTION, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE
ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL
CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW CARE TOWER (MONTGOMERY
COUNTY) ................................................................................ 115,000
(BO) HOWARD COUNTY – NEW CULTURAL CENTER (APCE).
PROVIDE A GRANT TO THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE AND
COUNTY COUNCIL OF HOWARD COUNTY FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF A NEW
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
CULTURAL CENTER. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2032 (HOWARD COUNTY ) ..................................... 300,000
(BP) KENNEDY KRIEGER INSTITUTE – LEAP FACILITY
RENOVATION AND EXPANSION. PROVIDE A GRANT OF
$100,000 TO THE KENNEDY KRIEGER INSTITUTE FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF
FACILITIES FOR THE LIFESKILL AND EDUCATION FOR
STUDENTS WITH AUTISM AND OTHER PERVASIVE
BEHAVIORAL CHALLENGES (LEAP) PROGRAM.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(BALTIMORE CITY) .............................................................. 100,000
(BQ) DISCOVERY POINT DEVELOPMENT PROJECT. PROVIDE A
GRANT TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE COLLEGE
PARK CITY – UNIVERSITY PARTNERSHIP, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE DISCOVERY POINT
REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY) ............................................................................. 130,115
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(A–1) [Maryland Center for Veterans Education and Training] SS
JOHN BROWN LIBERTY SHIP. Provide a grant of $200,000 to
the Board of Directors of [The Maryland Center for Veterans
Education and Training, Incorporated] PROJECT LIBERTY
SHIP, INC. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the [Maryland Center
for Veterans Education and Training Intensive Outpatient
Treatment Building, located in Baltimore City (Statewide)] SS
JOHN BROWN LIBERTY SHIP PROJECT.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(BALTIMORE CITY) .................................................................... 200,000
– 37 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(E) [Cumberland YMCA Youth Center] AMERICAN LEGION POST
175. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of (i) $75,000 or (ii) the
amount of the matching fund provided, to the Board of
Directors of The Young Men’s Christian Association of
Cumberland Maryland] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF
THE AMERICAN LEGION SEVERNA PARK POST 175, INC.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the [Cumberland YMCA
Youth Center, located in Allegany County (Allegany County)]
AMERICAN LEGION POST 175 FOR FACILITIES
IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING INTERIOR IMPROVEMENTS,
OUTDOOR FIELD SPACE, PARKING AND LIGHTING.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY) ................................................................... 75,000
(AH) Farming 4 Hunger Community Agricultural Facility. Provide a
grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$75,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of
the matching fund provided, to the Board of Directors of
Farming 4 Hunger, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a community
agricultural facility at the Thomas L. Hance Life Share
Building, located in Charles County. Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of in kind
contributions or funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Charles County) .................................................................... [75,000]
0
(AP) McComas School Museum. Provide a grant equal to the lesser
of (i) [$25,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of The Hosanna Community
House, Incorporated for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the McComas School
Museum facility, located in Harford County. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of real
property, in kind contributions, or funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Harford County) ................................... [25,000]
0
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
(AU) [Consumer Product Safety Commission Site] GAITHERSBURG
MUNICIPAL COMPLEX. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of
(i) $100,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,]
to the Mayor and City Council of the City of Gaithersburg for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the [former Consumer Product Safety
Commission site, located in Montgomery County]
GAITHERSBURG MUNICIPAL COMPLEX.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 100,000
(AV) Good Hope Local Park. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
[$50,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,
to the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Good Hope Local Park, located in
Montgomery County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of real property, in kind
contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective date of
this Act (Montgomery County)...................................................... [50,000]
0
(BD) [Young Israel Shomrai Emunah Social Hall] ADVENTIST
HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL CENTER. Provide a
grant [equal to the lesser of (i) $50,000 or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund provided, to the Board of Directors of Young
Israel Shomrai Emunah of Greater Washington] TO THE
BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE,
INC., D.B.A. ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE
MEDICAL CENTER for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the [Young Israel
Shomrai Emunah Social Hall, located in Montgomery County]
ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE SHADY GROVE MEDICAL
CENTER, INCLUDING A NEW CARE TOWER.
[Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of real property, in kind contributions, or funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act]
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 50,000
– 39 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(BJ) Hyattsville Veteran’s Memorial. Provide a grant equal to the
lesser of (i) [$30,000] $0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of the Hyattsville
Community Development Corporation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Hyattsville Veteran’s Memorial, located in Prince George’s
County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching
fund may consist of in kind contributions or funds expended
prior to the effective date of this Act (Prince George’s
County) .......................................................................................... [30,000]
0
(BT) Williamsport American Legion Post 202 World War II
Monument. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i) [$65,000]
$0 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to the
Board of Directors of the Potomac Post No. 202, The American
Legion, Incorporated for the Williamsport American Legion
Post 202, located in Washington County. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of real
property or in kind contributions (Washington County) ............. [65,000]
0
(BW) DISCOVERY POINT DEVELOPMENT PROJECT. PROVIDE A
GRANT TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE COLLEGE
PARK CITY – UNIVERSITY PARTNERSHIP, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE DISCOVERY POINT
REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY) ............................................................................. 90,000
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter 595 of the Acts of 2020
Section 1(3)
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(M) [Shake and Bake Family Fun Center] BETHEL OUTREACH
CENTER. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of (i)] OF $20,000
[or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to the Board
of Directors of the Shake and Bake Community Development
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
Center, Inc.] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE BETHEL
OUTREACH CENTER, INC. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
[Shake and Bake Family Fun Center, located in Baltimore City.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the grantee has until
June 1, 2022, to present evidence that a matching fund will be
provided and the matching fund may consist of in kind
contributions] BETHEL OUTREACH CENTER.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 20,000
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter 737 of the Acts of 2019
Section 1(3)
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(BK) [Maryland Multicultural Youth Centers] DISCOVERY POINT
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser
of (i) $75,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,
to the Board of Directors of the Latin American Youth Center,
Inc.] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE COLLEGE
PARK CITY – UNIVERSITY PARTNERSHIP, INC. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the [Center for Educational Partnership of
the Maryland Multicultural Youth Centers, located in Prince
George’s County. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
grantee has until June 1, 2021, to present evidence that a
matching fund will be provided and the matching fund may
consist of in kind contributions (Prince George’s County)]
DISCOVERY POINT REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY) .................................................. 75,000
(BO) [St. Nicholas Catholic Church Parish Hall] CRITCHLOW
ADKINS CHILDREN’S CENTER’S CORDOVA SITE
EXPANSION. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of (i) $50,000
or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to the
Archdiocese of Washington–St. Nicholas Catholic Church] TO
THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF EASTON DAY CARE
– 41 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
CENTER, INC. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the [parish hall for
St. Nicholas Catholic Church, including landscaping and
general improvements to the grounds surrounding the
Parish Hall, located in Prince George’s County.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the grantee has until
June 1, 2021, to present evidence that a matching fund will be
provided (Prince George’s County)] CRITCHLOW ADKINS
CHILDREN’S CENTER’S CORDOVA SITE EXPANSION
PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2032 (TALBOT COUNTY) ............................................ 50,000
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018 and
Chapter 595 of the Acts of 2020
Section 1(3)
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(AH) [ManneqART Facility] DISCOVERY POINT DEVELOPMENT
PROJECT. Provide a $50,000 grant to the Board of Directors of
[ManneqART, Inc.] THE COLLEGE PARK CITY – UNIVERSITY
PARTNERSHIP, INC. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the [ManneqART
facility, located in Howard County (Howard County)]
DISCOVERY POINT REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY) .................................................. 50,000
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(U) [Camp Puh’tok] KENNEDY KRIEGER INSTITUTE – LEAP
FACILITY RENOVATION AND EXPANSION. Provide a grant to
the [Board of Directors of Camp Puh’tok for Boys and Girls,
Inc.] KENNEDY KRIEGER INSTITUTE for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, EXPANSION, repair,
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of [a therapeutic riding facility for Camp Puh’tok,
located in Baltimore County (Baltimore County)] FACILITIES
FOR THE LIFESKILL AND EDUCATION FOR STUDENTS
WITH AUTISM AND OTHER PERVASIVE BEHAVIORAL
CHALLENGES (LEAP) PROGRAM. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (BALTIMORE CITY) ......
100,000
(AQ) [Carrollton Hall Restoration] CRITCHLOW ADKINS
CHILDREN’S CENTER’S CORDOVA SITE EXPANSION.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of [Carrollton Hall,
Inc.] EASTON DAY CARE CENTER, INC. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, EXPANSION, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of [Carrollton Hall and the surrounding grounds,
located in Howard County (Howard County)] THE
CRITCHLOW ADKINS CHILDREN’S CENTER’S CORDOVA
SITE EXPANSION PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (TALBOT COUNTY)............................. 125,000
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter 737 of the Acts of 2019 and
Chapter 626 of the Acts of 2022
Section 1(3)
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(AS) [Madison Fields Therapeutic Equestrian Center] DISCOVERY
POINT DEVELOPMENT PROJECT. Provide a grant [of $60,000
to the Board of Directors of the Madison House Autism
Foundation, Inc.] TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
COLLEGE PARK CITY – UNIVERSITY PARTNERSHIP, INC.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the [Madison Fields
Therapeutic Equestrian Center, located in Montgomery County
(Montgomery County)] DISCOVERY POINT
REDEVELOPMENT PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY) ...................................................................................... [60,000]
– 43 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
24,515
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(M) Dulaney High School – Athletic Fields. Provide a grant to the
[County Executive and County Council] BOARD OF
EDUCATION of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the athletic fields at
Dulaney High School. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2030 (Baltimore County) .............................................. 150,000
(BU) American Visionary Art Museum. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of The American Visionary Art Museum, Inc. for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the [Jim Rouse Visionary Center at the] American
Visionary Art Museum. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2030 (Baltimore City) ................................................... 250,000
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AJ–1) ALEF BET MONTESSORI SCHOOL. PROVIDE A GRANT TO
THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE ALEF BET
MONTESSORI SCHOOL INC. FOR THE PLANNING,
DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR,
RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT,
AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE INFRASTRUCTURE OF
ALEF BET MONTESSORI SCHOOL, INCLUDING
ELECTRICAL WORK. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (MONTGOMERY
COUNTY) ................................................................................ 25,000
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
(BB) Sinai Hospital of Baltimore. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Sinai Hospital of Baltimore, Inc. for the planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, and capital equipping
of a community primary and specialty care complex AND
ADJACENT REQUIRED PARKING GARAGE.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 1,000,000
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019, as amended by Chapter 576 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AJ) KID Museum[ – Facility]. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of KID Museum, Inc. for the planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the KID Museum,
INCLUDING A TRAILER AND EQUIPMENT TO OUTFIT A
MOBILE MUSEUM AND DIGITAL RECORDING STUDIO.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. [300,000]
275,000
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AG) Johns Hopkins Bayview Medical Center – [New Inpatient
Building and Renovation] THE JOHN R. BURTON PAVILION.
Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of Johns Hopkins
Health System for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of [an inpatient
building] THE JOHN R. BURTON PAVILION (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 2,000,000
(BF) [St. Mary’s County – Regional Agricultural Center] PASCAL
CRISIS STABILIZATION CENTER – SOUTHERN MARYLAND.
Provide a grant to the [St. Mary’s County Commissioners
Southern Maryland Agricultural Development Commission of
– 45 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
the Tri–County Council of Southern Maryland] BOARD OF
DIRECTORS OF PASCAL CRISIS SERVICES, INC. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the [Regional Agricultural Center]
PASCAL CRISIS STABILIZATION CENTER IN SOUTHERN
MARYLAND. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2032 (St. Mary’s County) ............................................................ 200,000
(CF) Habitat for Humanity of the Chesapeake. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Habitat for Humanity of the
Chesapeake, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Habitat for
Humanity of the Chesapeake homes in [Belair Edision]
BELAIR–EDISON OR ORCHARD RIDGE (Baltimore City) ...... 250,000
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AP) Sinai Hospital of Baltimore, Inc. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of Sinai Hospital of Baltimore, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping
of a community primary specialty care complex AND
ADJACENT REQUIRED PARKING GARAGE.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2029
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 1,000,000
(BL) White Flint Transit Station – Rebranding. Provide a grant to
[Friends of White Flint] THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE AND
COUNTY COUNCIL OF MONTGOMERY COUNTY for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
local Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority transit
station, including capital costs related to the renaming and
rebranding of the station (Montgomery County) ....................... 250,000
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
(C) Doctors Community Hospital. Provide a grant to Luminis
Health to assist in the design, construction, and equipping of a
simulated learning center[, subject to the requirement that the
grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act] (Prince George’s County) ...................................................... 54,000
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(AE) [The Club Expansion at Collington Square] IND WATER
MAIN REPLACEMENT PROJECT. Provide a grant to the
[Board of Directors of Strong City Baltimore, Inc.] BALTIMORE
CITY DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC WORKS (DPW) for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, expansion, site improvement,
and capital equipping of the [Club at Collington Square facility,
located in Baltimore City] IND WATER MAIN REPLACEMENT
PROJECT (Baltimore City) .......................................................... [200,000]
100,000
(AE–1) 4M SWIM CLUB. PROVIDE A GRANT TO THE BOARD OF
DIRECTORS OF THE 4M SWIM CLUB, INC. FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL
EQUIPPING OF THE 4M SWIM CLUB (BALTIMORE CITY) .... 100,000
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(Statewide)
(B) (5) City of Salisbury – [Rail Trail Phase
Five] NORTH PRONG PROJECT
(Wicomico County)............................... 500,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Z) [Coldspring Commons] SMALLWOOD SQUARE. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Visionary Venture Charities,
– 47 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Visionary Venture
Charities properties IN THE WEST NORTH AVENUE
DEVELOPMENT AREA (Baltimore City) .................................... 300,000
(FC–1) CHARLOTTE HALL VETERANS HOME – WHITE HOUSE.
PROVIDE A GRANT TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES FOR THE
ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION,
SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE
HISTORIC WHITE HOUSE AT CHARLOTTE HALL
VETERANS HOME, INCLUDING REPLACEMENT OF THE
DOORS AND ENTRYWAY. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (ST. MARY’S COUNTY) .................... 50,000
(DI) GGSF Community Outreach Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of Trustees of The Guru Gobind Singh Foundation Trust
Inc for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of GGSF Community Outreach Center PROPERTY
AT 1010 WESTMORE AVENUE, ROCKVILLE (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 75,000
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(CN) GGSF Community Outreach Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of Trustees of The Guru Gobind Singh Foundation Trust
Inc for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of GGSF Community Outreach Center PROPERTY
AT 1010 WESTMORE AVENUE, ROCKVILLE (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 225,000
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(DG) [Landover Housing Coalition] VILLAGE GREEN MUTUAL
HOMES. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Human
Services Coalition of Prince George’s County, Inc. dba Nonprofit
Prince George’s County (NPGC) for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
several properties, including housing and other public services
and improvements (Prince George’s County) ............................... 500,000
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 141 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(DV–3) [Town of Luke Maintenance–Storage Building] KITZMILLER
VOLUNTEER FIRE DEPARTMENT. Provide a grant to [the
Mayor and Town Council of the Town of Luke] THE
KITZMILLER VOLUNTEER FIRE DEPARTMENT, INC. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
[municipal operations maintenance and storage facilities
(Allegany County)] RESCUE 78 UNIT (GARRETT
COUNTY) ...................................................................................... 50,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(FC) [Regional Agriculture Center] PASCAL CRISIS
STABILIZATION CENTER – SOUTHERN MARYLAND. Provide
a grant to the [Southern Maryland Agricultural Development
Commission] BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF PASCAL CRISIS
SERVICES, INC. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the [Regional
Agriculture Center] PASCAL CRISIS STABILIZATION
CENTER IN SOUTHERN MARYLAND. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032 (St. Mary’s County) ........ [150,000]
100,000
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 722 of the Acts of 2024
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(GB–1) Northern Community Action Center – Redevelopment [and],
Reconstruction [Study], AND EXPANSION. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Baltimore City Community Action
Partnership [and the Baltimore City Department of Planning]
– 49 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
for THE ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, REPAIR, RENOVATION,
RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL
EQUIPPING, INCLUDING preliminary planning [including],
predevelopment, and feasibility studies, and design of A
PHASED–IN PROJECT TO BROADEN THE USE OF THE
NORTHERN COMMUNITY ACTION CENTER (5225 YORK
ROAD) SITE TO INCREASE OPPORTUNITIES FOR HEALTH
CARE, EDUCATIONAL, AND SOCIAL ENTERPRISE USES OF
the Northern Community Action Center Project as part of the
Greater Govans York Road Corridor plan (Baltimore City) ....... 300,000
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AE) White Flint Metro Station North Entrance. Provide a grant to
the [Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority]
COUNTY EXECUTIVE AND COUNTY COUNCIL OF
MONTGOMERY COUNTY for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the north entrance of
the White Flint Metro Station (Montgomery County) ................ 2,600,000
(BE) [Dunfield Recreational Activity Center] HOLLAND HILLS
PARK. Provide a grant to the County Executive and County
Council of Baltimore County for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of [the Dunfield
Recreational Activity Center] HOLLAND HILLS PARK
(Baltimore County) ....................................................................... 150,000
(CY) Cheverly Hospital Demolition. Provide a grant to the [County
Executive and County Council] REDEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITY of Prince George’s County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
demolition of Cheverly Hospital (Prince George’s County) ........ 8,000,000
(ET) Clay Hill Public Charter School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the [Patterson Park Public Charter School, Inc.]
BLUEBIRD EDUCATION NETWORK, INC., THE NON–PROFIT
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
OPERATOR OF CLAY HILL PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Clay Hill Public Charter School (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 500,000
(HP) [Family Support Center] EAST COLUMBIA 50+ CENTER.
Provide a grant to the County Executive and County Council of
Howard County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of [a family support
center] THE EAST COLUMBIA 50+ CENTER, INCLUDING
PROCUREMENT OF EQUIPMENT, AND PARTIAL DESIGN
COSTS. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT,
THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(Howard County) .......................................................................... 200,000
(JT) [The Flats at Knowles Station – Public Parking] 10415
MONTGOMERY AVENUE – PUBLIC PARKING. Provide a
grant to the Mayor and Town Council of The Town of
Kensington for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of [The Flats at Knowles Station project] THE
PROPERTY AT 10415 MONTGOMERY AVENUE (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 400,000
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(CS) Village Green Mutual Homes. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Human Services Coalition of Prince George’s
County, Inc. D.B.A. NONPROFIT PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY (NPGC) for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of [Village Green
Mutual Homes] SEVERAL PROPERTIES, INCLUDING
HOUSING AND OTHER PUBLIC SERVICES AND
IMPROVEMENTS (Prince George’s County)................................ 100,000
(DC) [North High 400m Running Track – Practice Track] FEDERAL
LITTLE LEAGUE. Provide a grant to the [Washington County
Board of Education] BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF FEDERAL
LITTLE LEAGUE OF HAGERSTOWN, INC. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, EXPANSION, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
– 51 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
equipping of the [North High 400m Running Track (Practice
Track)] FEDERAL LITTLE LEAGUE FACILITIES.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2032
(Washington County) ................................................................... 50,000
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(A) [George’s Creek Ambulance Service Facility] GRANTSVILLE
VOLUNTEER FIRE DEPARTMENT. Provide a grant to the
[Board of Directors of George’s Creek Ambulance Service, Inc.]
BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OF GARRETT
COUNTY for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of [the George’s Creek
ambulance service facility] SELF–CONTAINED BREATHING
APPARATUS (SCBA) FOR THE GRANTSVILLE VOLUNTEER
FIRE DEPARTMENT ([Allegany] GARRETT County) ............... 75,000
(U) [Mack Lewis Gym Renovation] 4M SWIM CLUB. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of [the Historic East Baltimore
Community Action Coalition, Inc.] THE 4M SWIM CLUB, INC.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the [Mack Lewis Gym]
4M SWIM CLUB PROPERTY, INCLUDING THE SCOREBOARD
AND BASKETBALL GYM REPAIRS (Baltimore City) ................. 200,000
(CA) [The Flats at Knowles Station – Public Parking] 10415
MONTGOMERY AVENUE – PUBLIC PARKING. Provide a
grant to the Mayor and Town Council of The Town of
Kensington for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of [The Flats at Knowles Station project] THE
PROPERTY AT 10415 MONTGOMERY AVENUE (Montgomery
County) ......................................................................................... 400,000
(CG) [Marlboro Pike – Public Art Playground]
HARTMAN–BERKSHIRE PARK PLAYGROUND. Provide a
grant to the Board of [Directors of the Marlboro Pike
Partnership CDC, Inc.] COMMISSIONERS OF THE
MARYLAND–NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK AND PLANNING
COMMISSION for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
improvement, and capital equipping of the [Marlboro Pike –
Public Art Playground] HARTMAN–BERKSHIRE PARK
PLAYGROUND (Prince George’s County) ................................... 100,000
(CP) [Regional Agriculture Center] PASCAL CRISIS
STABILIZATION CENTER – SOUTHERN MARYLAND. Provide
a grant to the Board of Directors of the [Tri–County Council for
Southern Maryland] PASCAL CRISIS SERVICES, INC. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the [Regional Agriculture Center]
PASCAL CRISIS STABILIZATION CENTER IN SOUTHERN
MARYLAND. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2032 (St. Mary’s County) ............................................................ 100,000
Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
Section 1(3)
RQ00 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM
(B) UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND Capital Region [Medical Center
– Ella Medical Office Building] HEALTH. Provide a grant to
the University of Maryland Medical System for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, EXPANSION, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of [the Ella Medical Office Building on the Capital
Region Medical Center Largo campus, including building out
urgent care space] URGENT CARE FACILITIES IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY (Prince George’s County) ......................... 2,500,000
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT
SA24 DIVISION OF NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION
(A)(12) Neighborhood Impact Investment Fund Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of [the
mixed–use Pigtown Library project] CHARMTV ....................... 750,000
(D)(2) Montgomery County, Maryland for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
– 53 –

Ch. 643 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
[redevelopment of the 11255 New Hampshire Avenue block in
Silver Spring] THE WHITE OAK AREA COMMERCIAL
REVITALIZATION ........................................................................ 2,000,000
(D)(6) [County Executive and County Council] REDEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITY of Prince George’s County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
demolition and redevelopment of Cheverly Hospital .................. 5,000,000
(G)(2) [County Executive and County Council] REDEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITY of Prince George’s County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
demolition and redevelopment of Cheverly Hospital .................. 2,500,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(C) [Blue Line Corridor – Film Studio and Soundstage Renovation]
OLD FAIRMOUNT FAIRMONT HEIGHTS HIGH SCHOOL –
SECURITY UPGRADES. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Prince George’s County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of [a film studio and soundstage in the Arts
and Entertainment District] THE OLD FAIRMOUNT
FAIRMONT HEIGHTS HIGH SCHOOL (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... [5,000,000]
300,000
(C–1) CHEVERLY PUBLICK PLAYHOUSE. PROVIDE A GRANT TO
THE BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS OF THE
MARYLAND–NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK AND PLANNING
COMMISSION FOR THE ACQUISITION, PLANNING, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR, RENOVATION,
RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT, AND CAPITAL
EQUIPPING OF THE CHEVERLY PUBLICK PLAYHOUSE
(PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY) .............................................. 4,700,000
(FD) Historic Howard Hotel Building. Provide a grant to the Officers
of the [Sandy Island LLC] HH OWNER LLC for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 643
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
downtown Elkton revitalization of the Historic Howard Hotel
Building (Cecil County) ................................................................ 100,000
(FH) Clay Hill Public Charter School. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the [Patterson Park Public Charter School, Inc.]
BLUEBIRD EDUCATION NETWORK, INC., THE NON–PROFIT
OPERATOR OF CLAY HILL PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of Clay Hill Public Charter School (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... 100,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(BC) Historic Howard Hotel Building. Provide a grant to the Officers
of the [Sandy Island LLC] HH OWNER LLC for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
downtown Elkton revitalization of the Historic Howard Hotel
Building (Cecil County) ................................................................ 100,000
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 55 –